Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1602
Program; administration.

Sections 84-1601 to 84-1615 shall be administered by the personnel division of the Department of Administrative Services. The Director of Personnel may employ such administrative, clerical, secretarial, and technical assistants and consultants as are required for the administration of such sections.

Laws 1973, LB 516, § 2;

Laws 1987, LB 491, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 44-1621;

Laws 1992, Third Spec. Sess., LB 14, § 32;

Laws 1996, LB 1252, § 2;

Laws 2000, LB 654, § 48.